Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Lien of Judgment and Enforcement by Execution
§ 1-17-322.
Conveyance of realty by master commissioner.

A master commissioner,
upon order by the court, may convey real property when a party to
a proceeding has been ordered to convey the property to another and
fails or refuses to obey the order. The master commissioner may also
execute a conveyance when specific real property is sold by him under
an order or judgment of the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 405; R.S. 1887, § 2745; R.S. 1899, § 3852; C.S. 1910, § 4706; C.S. 1920, § 5979; R.S. 1931, § 89-2939; C.S. 1945, § 3-4229; W.S. 1957, § 1-385; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-322.

§ 1-17-323.
Administering of oaths; sheriff as commissioner; sales by master.

A master commissioner
or special master who sells real property has the same power to administer
oaths as the sheriff. A sheriff may act as a master commissioner and,
upon notice and for reasonable compensation to be paid by the master
commissioner out of his fees, may attend and make sale for any commissioner
who, by reason of sickness is unable to attend. Sales made by a master
shall conform in all respects to the laws regulating sales of lands
upon execution.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 406; R.S. 1887, § 2746; R.S. 1899, § 3853; C.S. 1910, § 4707; C.S. 1920, § 5980; R.S. 1931, § 89-2940; C.S. 1945, § 3-4230; W.S. 1957, § 1-386; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-323.

Cross references. —

As to other officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

and note thereunder.

As to sale and redemption of lands upon execution, see chapter 18 of this title.

§ 1-17-324.
Effect of deed.

The deed is prima facie
evidence of the legality and regularity of the sale and the entire
estate and interest of the person whose property the officer sells
and conveys shall thereby rest in the purchaser, whether that interest
existed at the time the property became liable to satisfy the judgment,
or was acquired subsequently.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 408; R.S. 1887, § 2748; R.S. 1899, § 3855; C.S. 1910, § 4709; C.S. 1920, § 5982; R.S. 1931, § 89-2942; C.S. 1945, § 3-4231; W.S. 1957, § 1-387; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-324.

Cross references. —

For another provision concerning effect of deed, see §

1-18-110

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-325.
Printer's fees for notice.

The officer who makes
a levy or holds an order of sale may demand of the plaintiff the fees
of the printer for publishing the notice and the officer is not required
to make publication until the fees are paid.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 409; R.S. 1887, § 2749; R.S. 1899, § 3856; C.S. 1910, § 4710; C.S. 1920, § 5983; R.S. 1931, § 89-2943; C.S. 1945, § 3-4232; W.S. 1957, § 1-388; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-325.

§ 1-17-326.
Where realty sold; certain purchases void.

All sales of lands or
tenements under execution or order of sale shall be held at the courthouse
in the county in which the lands and tenements are situated, unless
otherwise ordered by the court. Purchases of real or personal property
by the officer making sale or by an appraiser of the property are
void.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 410; R.S. 1887, § 2750; R.S. 1899, § 3857; C.S. 1910, § 4711; C.S. 1920, § 5984; R.S. 1931, § 89-2944; C.S. 1945, § 3-4233; W.S. 1957, § 1-389; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-326.

Cross references. —

See also §§

1-18-101

and

1-21-603

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Inadequacy of price as basis for setting aside execution or sheriff's sale — modern cases, 5 ALR4th 794.

§ 1-17-327.
Alias executions against realty.

If lands and tenements
levied on or ordered sold are not sold upon one (1) execution, other
executions may be issued.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 411; R.S. 1887, § 2751; R.S. 1899, § 3858; C.S. 1910, § 4712; C.S. 1920, § 5985; R.S. 1931, § 89-2945; C.S. 1945, § 3-4234; W.S. 1957, § 1-390; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-327.

§ 1-17-328.
Separate levies on separate parcels of land.

When two (2) or more executions having different preferences are to be satisfied by levying upon real estate, either judgment creditor may require the officer to make a separate levy for his execution. The officer levying the executions may choose such part of the debtor’s real property as is sufficient, at two-thirds (2/3) of the appraised value of the judgment debtor’s interest, to satisfy the executions.

When two (2) or more executions having no preference as to each other are to be satisfied by levying upon real property, either judgment creditor may require the officer to levy upon separate parcels if the appraisers determine that the property may be divided without material injury.

If two-thirds (2/3) of the appraised value of the judgment debtor’s interest in real property is not sufficient to satisfy all the executions chargeable against it, that part of the property shall be levied on to satisfy each execution as will bear the same proportion in value to the whole as the amount due on the execution bears to the amount of all the executions chargeable thereon, as near as may be, according to the appraised value of the judgment debtor’s interest in each separate parcel.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 412; R.S. 1887, § 2752; R.S. 1899, § 3859; C.S. 1910, § 4713; C.S. 1920, § 5986; R.S. 1931, § 89-2946; C.S. 1945, § 3-4235; W.S. 1957, § 1-391; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-328; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to fees of real estate appraisers, see §

1-17-341

.

§ 1-17-329.
Certificate or deed by successor officer.

If the term of the officer
who makes a sale of any lands and tenements expires, or he is unable
from any cause to make a certificate of sale or a deed of conveyance
of the property sold, any successor of the officer on receiving a
certificate from the court from which execution issued setting forth
that sufficient proof has been made that the sale was fairly and legally
made, and on tender or proof of payment of the purchase money, may
execute to the purchaser or his legal representatives a certificate
of sale or a deed of conveyance of the lands and tenements sold. The
certificate or deed shall be as valid in law as if the officer who
made the sale had executed it.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 413; R.S. 1887, § 2753; R.S. 1899, § 3860; C.S. 1910, § 4714; C.S. 1920, § 5987; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 96; R.S. 1931, § 89-2947; C.S. 1945, § 3-4236; W.S. 1957, § 1-392; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-329.

§ 1-17-330.
Disposition of surplus proceeds.

If there remains in the
hands of the officer after an execution sale more money than necessary
to satisfy the writ of execution with interest and costs, the officer
shall pay the balance to the defendant in execution or his legal representatives.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 414; R.S. 1887, § 2754; R.S. 1899, § 3861; C.S. 1910, § 4715; C.S. 1920, § 5988; R.S. 1931, § 89-2948; C.S. 1945, § 3-4237; W.S. 1957, § 1-393; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-330.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-331.
Effect of reversal of judgment.

If a judgment in satisfaction
of which lands or tenements are sold is thereafter reversed, the reversal
shall not affect the title of the purchaser, but the judgment creditor
shall make restitution of the money received from the sale with lawful
interest from the day of sale.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 415; R.S. 1887, § 2755; R.S. 1899, § 3862; C.S. 1910, § 4716; C.S. 1920, § 5989; R.S. 1931, § 89-2949; C.S. 1945, § 3-4238; W.S. 1957, § 1-394; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-331.

Cross references. —

As to judgment rate of interest, see §

1-16-102

.

As to rate of interest when there is no agreement or provision of law specifying the rate, see § 40-14-106(e).

Assumption of equitable jurisdiction held not warranted on ground that suit was one to quiet title,

particularly in absence of any allegation that either party was in possession of the lands or that they were unoccupied, in view of this section. Investors' Guaranty Corp. v. Luikart, 5 F.2d 793, 1925 U.S. App. LEXIS 2757 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1925).

§ 1-17-332.
Rights of purchaser where sale invalid.

If the title of the purchaser is invalid by reason of a procedural defect in the sale of property on execution, the purchaser is subrogated to the right of the creditor against the debtor to the extent of the money paid and applied to the debtor’s benefit, and shall have a lien therefor on the property sold as against all persons except bona fide purchasers without notice. The creditor is not required to refund the purchase money by reason of the invalidity of any such sale.

This section applies to all sales by order of court, sales by executors, administrators, guardians and assignees and to all sales for taxes.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 416, 417; R.S. 1887, §§ 2756, 2757; R.S. 1899, §§ 3863, 3864; C.S. 1910, §§ 4717, 4718; C.S. 1920, §§ 5990, 5991; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-2950, 89-2951; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4239, 3-4240; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-395, 1-396; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-332.

Right to reimbursement. —

Though deed from the county, based on its tax deed, was ineffectual as a transfer of title, it gave grantee a right to reimbursement under principles of equity, that have been recognized by statute and discussed by this court. Huber v. Delong, 54 Wyo. 240, 91 P.2d 53,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1939).

Where failure of assessor to make oath to assessment roll invalidated tax sale

for the next year, but did not make the taxes illegal nor unjust, it did not relieve former owner seeking to set aside the tax deed from reimbursing the tax deed holder. Huber v. Delong, 54 Wyo. 240, 91 P.2d 53,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1939).

Waiver of claim. —

In an action brought to cancel a tax title or quiet title to land, holder of tax title failing to allege payment of taxes by him, no judgment for amount of the taxes paid will be awarded to him, as he has right to waive his claim and he cannot thereafter maintain an action for the taxes so paid. Brewer v. Folsom Bros. Co., 43 Wyo. 517, 7 P.2d 224,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1932).

Law reviews. —

See “The Tax Sale Purchaser's Lien,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 275.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Inadequacy of price as basis for setting aside execution or sheriff's sale — modern cases, 5 ALR4th 794.

§ 1-17-333.
Sale of wrong property; vacation of satisfaction.

When a plaintiff in execution,
in good faith, has had a levy of execution and sale of property not
subject thereto, with the proceeds applied on his judgment, and a
recovery therefor has been had against him by the owner of the property,
the plaintiff, having paid the amount so recovered, on motion and
notice to the judgment defendant, in the court having control of the
judgment, may have the satisfaction made from the sale on execution
vacated and is entitled to collect the judgment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 418; R.S. 1887, § 2758; R.S. 1899, § 3865; C.S. 1910, § 4719; C.S. 1920, § 5992; R.S. 1931, § 89-2952; C.S. 1945, § 3-4241; W.S. 1957, § 1-397; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-333.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of purchaser at execution sale, upon failure of title, to reimbursement or restitution from judgment creditor, 33 ALR4th 1206.

§ 1-17-334.
Sale of wrong property; remedy of levying officer.

When an officer levies
execution in good faith, upon property not subject thereto, sells
the property and applies the proceeds in satisfaction of the judgment,
and a recovery is had against him for its value, upon payment of the
recovery and on motion and notice to the execution defendant in the
court having control of the judgment, the officer may have the satisfaction
of the judgment vacated and execution issued for his use the same
as if the levy and sale had not been made.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 419; R.S. 1887, § 2759; R.S. 1899, § 3866; C.S. 1910, § 4720; C.S. 1920, § 5993; R.S. 1931, § 89-2953; C.S. 1945, § 3-4242; W.S. 1957, § 1-398; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-334.

Liability on bond. —

When an execution was vacated after levy, fact that sheriff surrendered the goods without consent of the execution creditor does not release the latter from his indemnity bond. W.F. Main Co. v. Morrow, 8 Wyo. 323, 57 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1899).

Where defendants, as execution creditors, executed an indemnity bond to the sheriff, reciting that execution had been levied, and that if sheriff retained, advertised and sold the goods under the execution, defendants would indemnify him, statement in respect to retention, advertising and sale being mere recital that sheriff would do his duty, and defendants were liable on the bond though execution was vacated and the goods surrendered before advertisement and sale. W.F. Main Co. v. Morrow, 8 Wyo. 323, 57 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1899).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of sheriffs, constables and marshals for defaults and misfeasances of clerks, assistants or deputies, 71 ALR2d 1140.

§ 1-17-335.
Sale of wrong property; rights of defendant and surety.

When a defendant in a
judgment or his surety mistakenly directs an execution issued on the
judgment to be levied on property not liable to execution, and thereby
wholly or partially satisfies the judgment, he may be compelled to
pay the owner of the property therefor. Thereafter, he shall have
the same rights against any codefendant in the judgment and against
any cosurety or principal in respect of the debts on which the judgment
is founded as though the satisfaction had been made out of the property
of the defendant or surety directing the levy.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 420; R.S. 1887, § 2760; R.S. 1899, § 3867; C.S. 1910, § 4721; C.S. 1920, § 5994; R.S. 1931, § 89-2954; C.S. 1945, § 3-4243; W.S. 1957, § 1-399; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-335.

§ 1-17-336.
When judgment loses preference; lien to continue for a year.

A judgment on which execution
is not levied before the expiration of one (1) year after its rendition
shall not operate as a lien on the estate of a debtor. When judgment
is rendered in the district or supreme court and a special mandate
is awarded to the district court to carry the same into execution,
the lien of the judgment creditor shall continue for one (1) year
after the mandate is filed with the county clerk. The special mandate
shall be entered on the journal of the district court before being
filed with the county clerk. In computing the period of one (1) year,
the time covered by an appeal of the case, by an injunction against
the execution, by a vacancy in the office of sheriff or by the inability
of the officer, shall be excluded.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 421; R.S. 1887, § 2761; R.S. 1899, § 3868; C.S. 1910, § 4722; C.S. 1920, § 5995; R.S. 1931, § 89-2955; C.S. 1945, § 3-4244; W.S. 1957, § 1-400; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-336; Laws 1999, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision excluding time during which judgment is stayed, see §

1-17-209

.

Construction. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-17-336

does not state that the judgment creditor's rights to execute on the debtor's property expire. Instead, it states that, if there is no execution within a year, the judgment ceases to operate a lien. Thus, even if their lien had expired, the judgment creditors could still execute on the debtor's property and a conveyance of the property by the debtor was fraudulent. Dev-Tech Corp. v. Wilson, Miller, Barton & Peek, Inc., 2004 WY 163, 102 P.3d 880,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 2004).

Execution where lien has expired. —

Although execution was not levied within one year of the filing of foreign judgments, which meant that the judgments were no longer liens under this section, the property remained available for execution pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-17-301

.
Cook v. Swires, 2009 WY 21, 202 P.3d 397,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2009).

Bankruptcy stay. —

It is apparent that the automatic stay does not operate to stop a creditor from maintaining or continuing the perfection of its security interest during the pendency of a bankruptcy case; however, under Wyoming law, a creditor must execute on its lien within one year of the date the judgment is rendered to maintain its lien. Execution of a judgment is considered a violation of the automatic stay, and, therefore, the court determined that the one-year period is stayed during the period of the automatic stay for execution of a judgment lien.
In re MarMC Transp., Inc., 2012 Bankr. LEXIS 3872 (Bankr. D. Wyo. Aug. 23, 2012).

Cited

in

Norman v. Jirdon Agri Chems., Inc. (In re Cockreham), 84 B.R. 757, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

See article “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

§ 1-17-337.
New appraisement of realty or execution; direction of sale price
by court.

When real estate taken
on execution is appraised and is twice advertised and offered for
sale but remains unsold for lack of bidders, the court from which
the execution issued on motion of the plaintiff or defendant shall
set aside the appraisement and order a new appraisement to be made,
or set aside the levy and appraisement and award a new execution to
issue. When the real estate or any part thereof has been three (3)
times appraised and thereafter twice advertised and offered for sale,
and remains unsold for lack of bidders, the court may direct the amount
for which the property shall be sold.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 422; R.S. 1887, § 2762; R.S. 1899, § 3869; C.S. 1910, § 4723; C.S. 1920, § 5996; R.S. 1931, § 89-2956; C.S. 1945, § 3-4245; W.S. 1957, § 1-401; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-337.

Cross references. —

For provision that purchase by officer making sale or by appraiser is void, see §

1-17-326

.

As to fees of real estate appraisers, see §

1-17-341

.

Sheriff cannot seek reappraisal of property to fit original bid.

2-2-H Ranch Co. v. Simmons, 658 P.2d 68,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 1-17-338.
Court order to sell land on time; terms of sale.

When premises are ordered
to be sold and having been twice advertised and offered for sale remain
unsold for lack of bidders, on motion of the plaintiff or defendant
the court from which the order of sale issued shall order a new appraisement,
and may also order that the land be sold on time with one-third (1/3)
cash in hand, one-third (1/3) in nine (9) months from the day of sale,
and the remaining one-third (1/3) in eighteen (18) months from the day
of sale. Deferred payments shall draw interest and be secured by a
mortgage on the premises.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 423; R.S. 1887, § 2763; R.S. 1899, § 3870; C.S. 1910, § 4724; C.S. 1920, § 5997; R.S. 1931, § 89-2457; C.S. 1945, § 2-4246; W.S. 1957, § 1-402; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-338.

Cross references. —

As to rate of interest on judgments, see §

1-16-102

.

For provision that purchase by officer making sale or by appraiser is void, see §

1-17-326

.

As to fees of real estate appraisers, see §

1-17-341

.

As to rate of interest when there is no agreement or provision of law for a different rate, see § 40-14-106(e).

Sheriff cannot seek reappraisal of property to fit original bid.

2-2-H Ranch Co. v. Simmons, 658 P.2d 68,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-339.
Return of execution.

The officer to whom a
writ of execution is directed shall return the writ to the court within
sixty (60) days from the date thereof.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 424; R.S. 1887, § 2764; R.S. 1899, § 3871; C.S. 1910, § 4725; C.S. 1920, § 5998; R.S. 1931, § 89-2958; C.S. 1945, § 3-4247; W.S. 1957, § 1-403; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-339.

Cross references. —

As to return of execution by mail, see §

1-17-342

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-340.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988,
ch. 37, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 425, related to the entry of judgment against a principal and surety and execution thereof.

§ 1-17-341.
Appraiser's
fees.

Each person appraising
real estate under W.S.

1-17-301

through

1-17-345

shall receive a reasonable fee to be collected on the
execution.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 426; R.S. 1887, § 2766; R.S. 1899, § 3873; C.S. 1910, § 4727; C.S. 1920, § 6000; R.S. 1931, § 89-2960; C.S. 1945, § 3-4249; W.S. 1957, § 1-405; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-341; 2009, ch. 168, § 103; 2011, ch. 16, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “other than qualified appraisers,”
following “1-17-345” and added the last sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “person appraising” for “appraiser of,” and deleted “other than qualified appraisers, shall receive
three dollars ($3.00) per day and one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per half day for his services, to be collected on the execution. Qualified appraisers so acting” following “1-17-345.”

Fee limitation unapplicable. —

The three dollar fee limit in this section does not apply in cases where the services of a qualified appraiser are required under §

1-17-316

to levy execution upon real property. A reasonable appraiser's fee is appropriate. TZ Land & Cattle Co. v. Grieve, 887 P.2d 511,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 1-17-342.
Return of execution to another county by mail.

When execution is issued
to the sheriff of another county, and the sheriff, having discharged
all the duties required of him by law, returns the execution by mail
to the clerk of the court who issued it soon enough to have reached
the office where it was issued within the time prescribed by law,
he is not liable for any penalty if it does not reach the office in
time.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 427; R.S. 1887, § 2767; R.S. 1899, § 3874; C.S. 1910, § 4728; C.S. 1920, § 6001; R.S. 1931, § 89-2961; C.S. 1945, § 3-4250; W.S. 1957, § 1-406; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-342.

Cross references. —

As to time of return of execution, see §

1-17-339

.

As to amercement of officer for failure to make timely return of execution, see §

1-24-101

.

§ 1-17-343.
Forwarding of money by mail.

A sheriff shall not forward
by mail any money made on execution unless he is specially instructed
to do so by the plaintiff, his agent or attorney.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 428; R.S. 1887, § 2768; R.S. 1899, § 3875; C.S. 1910, § 4729; C.S. 1920, § 6002; R.S. 1931, § 89-2962; C.S. 1945, § 3-4251; W.S. 1957, § 1-407; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-343.

§ 1-17-344.
Execution docket; entries.

The clerk of the district
court shall enter in the execution docket the full names of the parties
to the action in which an execution is issued, the number of the action
in the appearance docket, the number of the execution, the date of
its issue, the amount of the judgment, the costs due each person or
officer, the time when the judgment was rendered, the date of the
return and the return recorded in full.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 429; R.S. 1887, § 2769; R.S. 1899, § 3876; C.S. 1910, § 4730; C.S. 1920, § 6003; R.S. 1931, § 89-2963; C.S. 1945, § 3-4252; W.S. 1957, § 1-408; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-344.

§ 1-17-345.
Execution docket; index.

The clerk shall keep
an index to the execution docket showing in separate columns the names
of all parties against whom and in whose favor an execution has been
issued, the number of the execution and the number of the action upon
the appearance docket.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 430; R.S. 1887, § 2770; R.S. 1899, § 3877; C.S. 1910, § 4731; C.S. 1920, § 6004; R.S. 1931, § 89-2964; C.S. 1945, § 3-4253; W.S. 1957, § 1-409; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-345.

Cross references. —

As to recording, indexing and releasing judgments generally, see §

1-16-301

et seq.